Hawaii statutes.
[PART
VII.] WHOLESALE PRESCRIPTION DRUGS: STORAGE,

HANDLING, AND
RECORDKEEPING

[§328-111] Objective. The purpose of
this part is to establish the minimum requirements for the storage and handling
of wholesale prescription drugs and for the establishment and maintenance of
prescription drug distribution records by wholesale distributors, as required
by the federal Prescription Drug Marketing Act of 1987, Pub. L. 100-293, and 21
C.F.R. Part 205. [L 1992, c 196, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next